North Carolina, session 2025, SB129.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. G.S. 132-1.4 reads as rewritten:
"§ 132-1.4. Criminal investigations; intelligence information records; Innocence Inquiry
Commission records.
…
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Records Records of criminal investigations" means all investigations. – All
records or any information that pertains to a person or group of persons that is
compiled by public law enforcement agencies for the purpose of attempting
to prevent or solve violations of the law, including information derived from
witnesses, laboratory tests, surveillance, investigators, confidential
informants, photographs, and measurements. The term also includes any
records, worksheets, reports, or analyses prepared or conducted by the North
Carolina State Crime Laboratory at the request of any public law enforcement
agency in connection with a criminal investigation.
(2) "Records Records of criminal intelligence information" means records
information. – Records or information that pertain to a person or group of
persons that is compiled by a public law enforcement agency in an effort to
anticipate, prevent, or monitor possible violations of the law.
(3) "Public Public law enforcement agency" means a agency. – A municipal
police department, a county police department, a sheriff's office, a company
police agency commissioned by the Attorney General pursuant to G.S. 74E-1,
et seq., and any State or local agency, force, department, or unit responsible
for investigating, preventing, or solving violations of the law.
(4) "Violations Violations of the law" means crimes law. – Crimes and offenses
that are prosecutable in the criminal courts in this State or the United States
and infractions as defined in G.S. 14-3.1.
(5) "Complaining witness" means an Complaining witness. – An alleged victim
or other person who reports a violation or apparent violation of the law to a
public law enforcement agency.
(6) Booking photograph. – An image of an individual taken by an arresting public
law enforcement agency for the purpose of identification or taken when the
individual was processed into a jail.
…
*S129-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(n) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, and except as otherwise provided in this
subsection, booking photographs are confidential, are not public records as defined in G.S. 132-1,
and public law enforcement agencies are prohibited from publishing, distributing, or releasing
booking photographs. A public law enforcement agency may release a booking photograph only
when the booking photograph is a record of criminal investigation related to a missing person
report. A court of competent jurisdiction may order the release of a booking photograph upon a
showing by the person requesting disclosure that the disclosure is actually necessary for
immediate law enforcement needs."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 129-First Edition